fi: Haulikon supistajatyyppi: Sylinteri; Extra Full; Kiinteä supistaja; Täyssuppea; Parannettu sylinteri; Parannettu puolisuppea; Vaihtosupistajat; Puolisuppea; Rihlattu; Skeet; Muu
ko: 산탄총 초크 유형: 실린더; 엑스트라 풀; 고정식 초크; 풀; 임프루브드 실린더; 임프루브드 모디파이드; 교체형 초크; 모디파이드; 라이플; 스키트; 기타
it: Tipo di strozzatore del fucile: Cilindrica; Extra full; Strozzatura fissa; Full; Cilindrica modificata; Modificata migliorata; Strozzatori intercambiabili; Modificata; Raggiato; Skeet; Altro
tr: Av tüfeği şok tipi: Silindir; Ekstra tam; Sabit şok; Tam; Geliştirilmiş silindir; Geliştirilmiş yarım; Değiştirilebilir şoklar; Modifiye; Yivli; Skeet; Diğer
fr: Type de choke du fusil de chasse: Cylindrique; Extra plein; Choke fixe; Full; Cylindrique amélioré; Demi amélioré; Chokes interchangeables; Demi; Rayé; Skeet; Autre
ja: ショットガンチョークタイプ: シリンダー; エクストラフル; 固定チョーク; フル; インプルーブドシリンダー; インプルーブドモディファイド; 交換可能チョーク; モディファイド; ライフル; スキート; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de estrangulamento da espingarda: Cilíndrico; Extra full; Estrangulador fixo; Total; Cilíndrico melhorado; Modificado melhorado; Estranguladores intermutáveis; Modificado; Estriado; Skeet; Outro
ru: Тип чока дробовика: Цилиндр; Усиленный чок (Extra Full); Фиксированный чок; Полный; Цилиндр с напором; Усиленный получок; Сменные чоки; Получок; Нарезной; Скит; Другое
nb: Choketype for hagle: Sylinder; Ekstra full; Fast trangboring; Full; Forbedret sylinder; Forbedret modifisert; Utskiftbare choker; Modifisert; Riflet; Skeet; Annet
es: Tipo de estrangulador de escopeta: Cilíndrico; Extra full; Choque fijo; Full; Cilíndrico mejorado; Modificado mejorado; Choques intercambiables; Modificado; Estriado; Skeet; Otro
sl-SI: Vrsta zožitve cevi šibrovke: Cilinder; Zelo poln čok; Fiksni čok; Poln čok; Izboljšan cilinder; Izboljšan polčok; Zamenljivi čoki; Polčok (Modified); Žlebljen; Skeet; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ zúženia hlavne brokovnice: Valec; Extra plné; Pevné zahrdlenie; Plné (Full); Zlepšený valec; Zlepšené polovičné; Vymeniteľné zahrdlenie; Polovičné; Drážkované; Skeet; Iné
nl: Hagelgeweer choke type: Cilinder; Extra full; Vaste choke; Full; Improved cylinder; Improved modified; Verwisselbare chokes; Modified; Getrokken; Skeet; Overig
ro-RO: Tip de șoc pentru pușca de vânătoare: Cilindric; Extra Full; Șoc fix; Full; Cilindric îmbunătățit (Improved Cylinder); Modificat îmbunătățit (Improved Modified); Șocuri interschimbabile; Modificat; Ghintuit; Skeet; Altele
bg-BG: Тип чок на гладкоцевната пушка: Цилиндър; Екстра пълен шок; Фиксиран шок; Пълен шок; Подобрен цилиндър; Подобрен полушок; Сменяеми шокове; Полушок; Нарезна; Скийт; Друго
de: Choke-Typ der Schrotflinte: Zylinder; Extra Voll; Fester Choke; Voll; Viertel; Dreiviertel; Wechselchokes; Halb; Gezogen; Skeet; Andere
hr-HR: Vrsta prigušnice za sačmaricu: Cilindar; Izrazito puni čok (Extra Full); Fiksni čok; Puni čok (Full); Poboljšani cilindar; Poboljšano modificirani; Izmjenjivi čokovi; Modificirani (polučok); Užlijebljeni; Skeet; Drugo
cs: Typ tlumivky pro brokovnici: Cylinder; Extra Full; Pevné zahrdlení; Plné; Čtvrtinové; Tříčtvrteční; Výměnné zahrdlení; Poloviční; Drážkované; Skeet; Jiné
pl: Typ czoka strzelby: Cylinder; Extra Full; Czok stały; Pełny; Cylinder ulepszony; Ulepszony półczok; Wymienne czoki; Półczok; Gwintowany; Skeet; Inne
en: Shotgun choke type: Cylinder; Extra Full; Fixed choke; Full; Improved Cylinder; Improved Modified; Interchangeable chokes; Modified; Rifled; Skeet; Other
hu: Sörétes puska szűkítésének típusa: Henger; Extra Full; Fix szűkítés; Teljes; Javított henger; Javított módosított; Cserélhető szűkítők; Módosított; Huzagolt; Skeet; Egyéb
da: Choketype for haglgevær: Cylinder; Ekstra fuld; Fast trangboring; Fuld; Forbedret cylinder; Forbedret modificeret; Udskiftelige chokes; Modificeret; Riflet; Skeet; Andet
lt-LT: Šautuvo čoko tipas: Cilindras; Ypač pilnas; Fiksuotas droselis; Pilnas; Patobulintas cilindras; Patobulintas modifikuotas; Keičiami droseliai; Modifikuotas; Graižtvinis; Stendinis; Kita
vi: Loại choke súng săn: Trụ; Cực hẹp; Choke cố định; Toàn phần; Hình trụ cải tiến; Điều chỉnh cải tiến; Ống siết nòng có thể hoán đổi; Điều chỉnh; Có khương tuyến; Skeet; Khác
sv: Typ av choke för hagelgevär: Cylinder; Extra full; Fast choke; Full; Kvart; Trekvart; Utbytbara choker; Halv; Räfflad; Skeet; Övrigt
el: Τύπος τσοκ καραμπίνας: Κύλινδρος; Extra Full; Σταθερό τσοκ; Πλήρες; Βελτιωμένος κύλινδρος; Βελτιωμένο τροποποιημένο; Εναλλάξιμα τσοκ; Τροποποιημένο; Ραβδωτό; Σκιτ; Άλλο
th: โช้คปืนลูกซอง: ทรงกระบอก; เอ็กซ์ตราฟูล; โช้คตายตัว; ฟูล; อิมพรูฟไซลินเดอร์; อิมพรูฟโมดิฟายด์; โช้คแบบเปลี่ยนได้; โมดิฟายด์; ไรเฟิล; สกีต; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Espingarda choke tipo: Cilíndrico; Extra Full; Choque fixo; Full; Cilíndrico melhorado; Modificado melhorado; Choques intercambiáveis; Modificado; Estriado; Skeet; Outro
zh-TW: 散彈槍收束器類型: 圓柱縮口; 極全縮口; 固定縮口; 全縮口; 改良型圓筒縮口; 改良半縮口; 可互換縮口; 半縮口; 膛線縮口; 雙向飛靶縮口; 其他
zh-CN: 霰弹枪喉缩类型: 圆柱形; 特大收束; 固定收束; 全收束; 改良圆柱形; 改良半收束; 可互换收束器; 半收束; 线膛; 双向飞碟收束; 其他